Tennessee, session 114, HB1193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 1, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) By June 1, 2025, the department of education, in consultation with the state
board of education, shall conduct a landscape analysis of teacher evaluation practices in
this state and other states.
(b)
(1) The department shall convene a teacher evaluation advisory
committee composed of experienced educators in this state and other experts to
review and evaluate current teacher evaluation practices in this state. The
committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the department at
which time the committee ceases to exist.
(2) Members of the teacher evaluation advisory committee serve without
compensation but are eligible for reimbursement for travel expenses in
accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the
department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general
and reporter.
(c) The department shall present the findings of the teacher evaluation advisory
committee and the landscape analysis to the state board of education. The department
and the state board shall provide a final report that includes, but is not limited to, the
HB1193
003042
- 1 -

landscape analysis, the teacher evaluation advisory committee's recommendations, and
any further recommendations made by the department or the state board to the
education committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives
having jurisdiction over teacher evaluations by January 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003042